Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1582.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1733, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1733. School safety interoperability fund; school safety program; annual report; testing A. The school safety interoperability fund is established consisting of monies appropriated to the fund by the legislature. The department of administration shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. Monies in the fund shall be distributed to the sheriff of a county or a city or town police department that establishes a school safety program and may be used only for a school safety program that meets all of the following: 1. Encompasses schools throughout this state. 2. In a school safety program county, city or town, enables the deployment of a secure, multimedia data communications system to a user base consisting of public safety agencies and public schools providing instruction in any combination of kindergarten programs and grades one through twelve. 3. Provides a communications solution environment that allows for: (a) Identifying system users' identity, location and operational status during an incident. (b) Secure text messaging and file sharing to all users involved in during an incident. (c) Secure sharing of collaborative maps, building floor plans and images between schools and public safety agencies. (d) Integrating manually activated panic alarm systems that, when activated, establish direct collaboration between schools and public safety agencies. (e) Using multiple forms of real-time communications and information collaboration, including voice and, if feasible, full-motion video sharing, during an incident. 4. Is capable of being deployed to end users on existing communications assets owned by participating entities. 5. Allows each participating entity to maintain discretionary real-time control of all communications assets owned or operated by the entity. 6. Encrypts all media communications. 7. Is certified under the United States department of homeland security safety act as qualified anti-terrorism technology. 8. Is compatible with the federal emergency management agency interoperable gateway system for disaster communications. 9. Ensures student and staff privacy. 10. Enables integration to school access control systems to allow remote lockdown by law enforcement through the same multimedia system. B. On or before November 1 of each year, the sheriff of a county or a city or town police department that has established a school safety program pursuant to this section shall submit a report to the joint legislative budget committee of all expenditures made for the school safety program in the preceding fiscal year. c. Each participating public school shall test the school safety program not less than twice each calendar year to ensure FUNCTIONALITY. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation: school safety interoperability fund; distributions A. The sum of $3,200,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the school safety interoperability fund established by section 41-1733, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act. B. Notwithstanding any other law, in fiscal year 2026-2027, the department of administration may distribute monies in the fund to the following sheriffs' offices in the following amounts for continuing operation and maintenance of school safety programs authorized pursuant to section 41-1733, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act: 1. $275,000 to Apache county sheriff's office. 2. $280,000 to Gila county sheriff's office. 3. $280,000 to Graham county sheriff's office. 4. $170,000 to Greenlee county sheriff's office. 5. $200,000 to La Paz county sheriff's office. 6. $525,000 to Mohave county sheriff's office. 7. $540,000 to Navajo county sheriff's office. 8. $350,000 to Santa Cruz county sheriff's office. 9. $600,000 to Yavapai county sheriff's office.